Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.155

Return of member's contributions—Applicability.

The provisions of RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060 and 41.20.150 shall be applicable to all members employed on June 12, 1969, and to those who shall thereafter become members, but shall not apply to any former member who has terminated his or her employment prior to June 12, 1969.

[ 2012 c 117 s 33; 1969 c 123 s 4.]